Nebraska, session 109, LB1093.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1093 LB1093
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 76-2308, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-2308 Excavation shall mean any activity in which earth, rock, or
other material in or on the ground is moved or otherwise displaced by
means of tools, equipment, or explosives and shall include grading,
trenching, digging, ditching, drilling, augering, tunneling, scraping,
and cable or pipe plowing or driving but shall not include (1) normal
maintenance of roads if the maintenance does not change the original road
grade and does not involve the road ditch, (2) tilling of soil and
gardening for seeding and other agricultural purposes, (3) digging of
graves or in landfills in planned locations, (4) maintenance or
rebuilding of railroad track or facilities located on a railroad right-
of-way by the railroad company or its contractors when such maintenance
or rebuilding does not change the track grade, or (5) hand digging around
the base of a pole for pole inspection as part of routine maintenance or
replacement of a pole when the replacement pole is similarly sized and is
installed in the existing hole, or (6) hand digging by a
telecommunications service, community antenna television service, or
broadband service provider to a depth not exceeding eighteen inches for
the purpose of connecting a customer to the service provider's network.
Sec. 2. Original section 76-2308, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-